tr: Dikiş yöntemi: Elde dikilmiş; Hibrit; Makinede dikilmiş; Diğer
th: วิธีการเย็บ: เย็บด้วยมือ; ไฮบริด; เย็บด้วยเครื่องจักร; อื่นๆ
fi: Ompeleminen: Käsin ommeltu; Hybridi; Koneella ommeltu; Muu
ro-RO: Metodă de coasere: Cusut manual; Hibrid; Cusut la mașină; Altele
ko: 바느질 방법: 핸드 스티치; 하이브리드; 머신 스티치; 기타
it: Metodo di cucitura: Cucito a mano; Ibrido; Cucito a macchina; Altro
ru: Метод сшивания: Ручная строчка; Гибридная; Машинная строчка; Другое
hr-HR: Metoda šivanja: Ručno šivano; Hibridno; Strojno šivano; Ostalo
zh-TW: 縫合方式: 手工縫製; 混合; 機器縫製; 其他
cs: Metoda šití: Ručně šité; Hybridní; Strojově šité; Jiné
el: Μέθοδος ραφής: Ραμμένο στο χέρι; Υβριδικό; Ραμμένο στη μηχανή; Άλλο
en: Stitching method: Hand stitched; Hybrid; Machine stitched; Other
ja: 縫製方法: 手縫い; ハイブリッド; ミシン縫い; その他
pl: Metoda szycia: Szyty ręcznie; Hybrydowy; Szyty maszynowo; Inny
sk-SK: Metóda šitia: Ručne šité; Hybridné; Strojovo šité; Iné
zh-CN: 缝合方法: 手工缝制; 混合; 机器缝制; 其他
lt-LT: Susiuvimo būdas: Siūta rankomis; Hibridinis; Siūta mašina; Kita
da: Syningsmetode: Håndsyet; Hybrid; Maskinsyet; Andet
pt-BR: Costura método: Costurado à mão; Híbrido; Costurado à máquina; Outro
sl-SI: Metoda šivanja: Ročno šivano; Hibridno; Strojno šivano; Drugo
sv: Sömnadsmetod: Handsydd; Hybrid; Maskinsydd; Övrigt
bg-BG: Метод на зашиване: Ръчно шити; Хибрид; Машинно шити; Друго
de: Nähmethode: Handgenäht; Hybrid; Maschinengenäht; Andere
vi: Phương pháp khâu: Khâu tay; Lai; Khâu máy; Khác
fr: Mode de couture: Cousu main; Hybride; Cousu machine; Autre
es: Método de costura: Cosido a mano; Híbrido; Cosido a máquina; Otro
hu: Öltés módja: Kézzel varrott; Hibrid; Géppel varrott; Egyéb
nl: Stikmethode: Handgestikt; Hybride; Machinegestikt; Overig
pt-PT: Método de costura: Cosido à mão; Híbrido; Cosido à máquina; Outro
nb: Stikkmetode: Håndsydd; Hybrid; Maskinsydd; Annet